Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202568-2309
Report; department, duties.

(1) No later than February 15, 2026, and through February 15, 2028, the department shall submit an electronic report to the Clerk of the Legislature. Such report shall be made available on the department's website and shall include the following information, if available:

(a) The type and location of home visitation programs;

(b) The goals and achieved outcomes of home visitation programs;

(c) The number of families served by each home visitation program;

(d) Demographic data on the families served;

(e) The total amount of funds expended for home visitation programs;

(f) Program model descriptions and model-specific outcomes;

(g) The training and professional credentials required for each program model;

(h) Eligibility criteria for each program model;

(i) Target populations for each program model;

(j) Wait list information, if applicable; and

(k) Referral sources.

(2) The department shall only include outcomes from federally funded or state-funded home visitation programs.

Laws 2025, LB22, § 9.